Utah statutes.
57-3-202.   Recording master mortgage and trust deed -- Requirements for
master form -- Indexing by county recorder.
(1) (a)  A person may record a master form in the office of the county
recorder.
(b)  A person who files a master form shall state in the caption required
under Section 57-3-106 that the instrument is a master form.
(2)  A master form is not required to:
(a)  contain identification or description of any specific real property; or
(b)  name a specific:
(i)  mortgagor;
(ii)  trustor; or
(iii)  trustee.
(3)  A master form shall:
(a)  name a specific mortgagee or beneficiary;
(b)  contain an acknowledgment, proof, or certification; and
(c)  identify the person causing the recording of the master form.
(4)  A county recorder shall:
(a)  index a master form in the same manner as the county recorder indexes
mortgages and trust deeds in accordance with Section 17-21-6; and
(b)  indicate on all indices and records of the county referencing the master
form that the instrument is a master form.
(5) (a)  If a county recorder receives a document for recording that contains
both a master form and a mortgage or trust deed, the county recorder:
(i)  is not required to:
(A)  separate the master form from the mortgage or trust deed; or
(B)  record the master form and the mortgage or trust deed as separate
instruments; but
(ii)  may separate the master form from the mortgage or trust deed and record
only the master form if the unrecorded portion is clearly designated or marked
as a section not recorded.
(b)  A master form recorded under Subsection (5)(a), is considered as a master
form under this part for purposes of the incorporation by reference of a
previously recorded master form.
